Colorado statutes. TITLE 2 Legislative
PART 15
LEGISLATIVE EMERGENCY PREPAREDNESS, RESPONSE,
AND RECOVERY COMMITTEE

2-3-1501. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and determines that in the event of an emergency epidemic or disaster in the state, the general assembly must be prepared to respond to the emergency epidemic or disaster and have a plan for ensuring the continuation of its operations in order to assist in the protection of the health, safety, and welfare of the public.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire part added, p. 1288, § 1, effective May 25.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1080), ch. 55, p. 202, § 1, effective March 31.

2-3-1502. Definitions.

As used in this part 15, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Bioterrorism" means the intentional use of microorganisms or toxins of biological origin to cause death or disease among humans or animals.

Repealed.

"Department" means the department of public health and environment created in section 25-1-102, C.R.S.

(3.5) "Disaster" means the occurrence or imminent threat of widespread or severe damage, injury, illness, or loss of life or property resulting from an epidemic or a natural, man-made, or technological cause.

"Division" means the division of homeland security and emergency management in the department of public safety created in section 24-33.5-1603, C.R.S.

"Emergency epidemic" means cases of an illness or condition, communicable or noncommunicable, caused by bioterrorism, pandemic influenza, or novel and highly fatal infectious agents or biological toxins.

"GEEERC" means the governor's expert emergency epidemic response committee created in section 24-33.5-704.5.

"Legislative committee" means the legislative emergency preparedness, response, and recovery committee created in this part 15.

"Legislative service agencies" means the legislative council staff, the office of legislative legal services, the joint budget committee staff, the office of the state auditor, the legislative information services, the senate services staff, and the staff of the house of representatives.

"Pandemic influenza" means a widespread epidemic of influenza caused by a highly virulent strain of the influenza virus.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire part added, p. 1288, § 1, effective May 25.

L. 2010:

(3.5) added and (7) amended, (HB 10-1080), ch. 55, p. 202, § 2, effective March 31.

L. 2012:

(4) amended, (HB 12-1283), ch. 240, p. 1129, § 31, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(2) and (6) amended, (HB 13-1300), ch. 316, p. 1662, § 3, effective August 7.

L. 2014:

(2) repealed, (HB 14-1004), ch. 11, p. 107, § 13, effective February 27.

L. 2018:

(6) amended, (HB 18-1394), ch. 234, p. 1473, § 19, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2012 act amending subsection (4), see section 1 of chapter 240, Session Laws of Colorado 2012.

2-3-1503. Legislative emergency preparedness, response, and recovery committee - creation - membership - duties.

There is hereby created a legislative emergency preparedness, response, and recovery committee. The legislative committee shall develop a plan for the response by, and continuation of operations of, the general assembly and the legislative service agencies in the event of an emergency epidemic or disaster. The legislative committee shall cooperate and coordinate with the division, the department, and the GEEERC in developing the plan. The legislative committee shall develop and submit the plan to the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, the governor, the executive director of the department, the director of the division, and the GEEERC no later than July 1, 2011. The legislative committee shall meet at least annually to review and amend the plan as necessary and shall provide any updated plan to the persons or entities specified in this paragraph (a). The legislative committee may recommend legislation pertaining to the preparedness, response, and recovery by, and continuation of operations of, the general assembly and the legislative service agencies in the event of an emergency epidemic or disaster. The legislative committee shall provide information to and fully cooperate with the division, the department, and the GEEERC in fulfilling its duties under this section.

The legislative committee shall consist of eleven members as follows:

Two members of the senate, appointed by the president of the senate, with no more than one such member from the same political party;

Two members of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, with no more than one such member from the same political party;

The secretary of the senate;

The chief clerk of the house of representatives;

The staff director of the joint budget committee or the staff director's designee;

The director of research of the legislative council or the director's designee;

The director of the office of legislative legal services or the director's designee;

The state auditor or the state auditor's designee; and

The director of legislative information services or the director's designee.

In the event of an emergency epidemic or disaster that the governor declares to be a disaster emergency pursuant to section 24-33.5-704, C.R.S., the legislative committee shall convene as rapidly and as often as necessary to advise the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, and the legislative service agencies regarding reasonable and appropriate measures to be taken by the general assembly and the legislative service agencies to respond to the emergency epidemic or disaster and protect the public health, safety, and welfare. The legislative committee shall communicate, cooperate, and seek advice and assistance from the division, the department, and the GEEERC in responding to the emergency epidemic or disaster.

Except as otherwise provided in section 2-2-326, the members of the legislative committee shall serve without compensation.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire part added, p. 1289, § 1, effective May 25.

L. 2010:

(1)(a) and (2) amended, (HB 10-1080), ch. 55, p. 203, § 3, effective March 31; (1)(a) amended, (SB 10-213), ch. 375, p. 1761, § 4, effective June 7.

L. 2013:

(2) amended, (HB 13-1300), ch. 316, p. 1662, § 4, effective August 7.

L. 2014:

(1)(a) and (2) amended, (HB 14-1004), ch. 11, p. 107, § 14, effective February 27; (3) amended, (SB 14-153), ch. 390, p. 1960, § 3, effective June 6.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (1)(a) by House Bill 10-1080 and Senate Bill 10-213 were harmonized.

Cross references:

For the governor's expert emergency epidemic response committee, see § 24-33.5-704 (8).